Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.375

Large capacity magazines—Unfair method of competition.

Distributing, selling, offering for sale, or facilitating the sale, distribution, or transfer of a large capacity magazine online is an unfair or deceptive act or practice or unfair method of competition in the conduct of trade or commerce for purposes of the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

[ 2022 c 104 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2022 c 104: See notes following RCW 9.41.010.